Hawaii, session 2026, SB297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Article I of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "REPRODUCTIVE FREEDOM Section   .  The State shall not deny or interfere with an individual's reproductive freedom in their most intimate decisions, including: (1)  The right to choose to obtain an abortion of a nonviable fetus; (2)  An abortion that is necessary to protect the life or health of the parent; and (3)  The right to choose to obtain or use contraceptives." SECTION 2. The question to be printed on the ballot shall be as follows: "Shall the Constitution of the State of Hawaii be amended to prohibit the state from denying or interfering with an individual's reproductive freedom, including the right to: (1) Choose to obtain an abortion of a nonviable fetus; and (2) Choose to obtain or use contraceptives?" SECTION 3. New constitutional material is underscored. SECTION 4. This amendment shall take effect upon compliance with article XVII, section 3, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________